intl/locales/pa/hyphenation/hyph_pa.dic
UTF-8
LEFTHYPHENMIN 2
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
2‍2
1‌1
ਅ1
ਆ1
ਇ1
ਈ1
ਉ1
ਊ1
ਏ1
ਐ1
ਓ1
ਔ1
ਾ1
ਿ1
ੀ1
ੁ1
ੂ1
ੇ1
ੈ1
ੋ1
ੌ1
1ਕ
1ਖ
1ਗ
1ਘ
1ਙ
1ਚ
1ਛ
1ਜ
1ਝ
1ਞ
1ਟ
1ਠ
1ਡ
1ਢ
1ਣ
1ਤ
1ਥ
1ਦ
1ਧ
1ਨ
1ਪ
1ਫ
1ਬ
1ਭ
1ਮ
1ਯ
1ਰ
1ਲ
1ਲ਼
1ਵ
1ਸ਼
1ਸ
1ਹ
2ਁ1
2ਂ1
2ਃ1
2੍2
2ੰ2
2ੱ2
